Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 5 Leasing Generally
§ 36-5-108.
Even rental offers.

If two (2) or more qualified applicants under W.S.

36-5-101

shall offer the same annual rental for the same lands, and such offers are the highest offers received and are equal to or above the minimum rental fixed by the board, and no preferred right exists in the old lessee, or if the old lessee does not exercise the preferred right, the director shall grant the lease to the applicant holding title to lands nearest to the lands applied for. When a preferred right exists in the old lessee under the provisions of this act, the old lessee shall be given fifteen (15) days notice by registered mail, and if he fails or refuses to file his acceptance together with the balance of the rental due for the first year, within the time specified, the lease shall be awarded automatically to the applicant offering to pay the highest annual rental, or in the event of even offers, shall be disposed of as hereinbefore provided. As used in this section, “preferred right” means as defined in W.S. 36-5-105(h).

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 91-114; C.S. 1945, § 24-115; W.S. 1957, § 36-68; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 2022 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence, added “under W.S.

36-5-101

,” substituted “preferred right” for “preference,” “the preferred right” for “such preference,” in the second sentence, substituted “preferred right” for “preference,” “the old lessee” for “he” preceding “shall be given”; and added the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

Constitutionality. —

Giving preference to old lessee in applications for leases of school land is not unconstitutional as giving an absolute right of renewal. Mercer v. Thorley, 48 Wyo. 141, 43 P.2d 692,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1935).

Legislative intent. —

Laws 1929, ch. 108, the source of this section, contained a section immediately preceding it (now §

36-5-105

) which gave preference to persons holding title to lands “in the vicinity of the land applied for,” which provision was deleted from that section by a subsequent amendment and does not now appear in the statutes. However, it must be considered as having a bearing upon this section. Accordingly, it would seem that the legislature contemplated: (1) preference being given to an applicant whose land was in the vicinity; and (2) where two or more applicants had land in the vicinity, preference being given to the applicant holding title to lands nearest. Mahoney v. L. L. Sheep Co., 79 Wyo. 293, 333 P.2d 712,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1958).

Unnecessary for applicant to have land adjoining. —

Board acted under misapprehension of law in rejecting applications for grazing leases on ground that applicants had no land adjoining that applied for. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Only lands in vicinity required. —

To obtain preferential rights applicant for lease need not own adjoining lands; all that is required is that he has lands in vicinity of that applied for. Sullivan Co. v. Meer, 58 Wyo. 90, 125 P.2d 168,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1942).

Section has been superseded, if not repealed, by §

36-5-105

,

to such an extent as it might be construed as giving preference to one “holding title” to the nearest land over and above “lawful occupants” of adjoining land.
Risha v. Willadsen, 397 P.2d 803,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1964).

“Title,”

as used in this section, includes not necessarily a fee interest, but covers, in meaning, all the lesser estates in land. Brown v. Wintermute, 59 Wyo. 254, 139 P.2d 435,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1943).

“Title” does not mean “fee title,” but it may mean all the lesser estates in land. Risha v. Willadsen, 397 P.2d 803,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1964).

No vested right to renewal. —

Statute entitling lessee of state lands to renewal of lease for five-year periods, aggregating 20 years, did not give lessee of school lands granted to state by Act of Admission vested right to renewal, since that would violate condition on which school lands were granted to state. State ex rel. Huckfeldt v. State Bd. of Sch. Land Comm'rs, 20 Wyo. 162, 122 P. 94,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1912).

Where evidence shows board was not misled by any statements

of applicants to whom lease of state lands was awarded, board did not abuse its discretion in so awarding lease. Brown v. Wintermute, 59 Wyo. 254, 139 P.2d 435,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1943).

Division of land in complete parity not required. —

The board, in applying a statutory provision as unspecific as this section, is not required to divide the available state land in complete parity between adjoining owners. Mahoney v. L. L. Sheep Co., 79 Wyo. 293, 333 P.2d 712,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1958).

Preference of old lessee. —

An old lessee with a preference right will, in all cases, be given notice with an opportunity to file an acceptance and pay whatever balance of rental is due for the first year. Thompson v. Conwell, 363 P.2d 927,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1961).

Notice to old lessee. —

This section must be read in pari materia with art. 18, § 3, Wyo. Const., and with §§

36-2-101

and

36-3-102

. When so read, it becomes clear that this section requires 15 days' notice to be given to the old lessee after the rental has been finally fixed — either by the board approving the recommendation of the commissioner of public lands (now director of state land and farm loan office) or by taking some other action. There can be no doubt that the board is free to follow or to modify or to disregard what the commissioner (now director) has recommended. Reese v. Bruegger Ranches, 463 P.2d 23,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1969).

When not properly given. —

The notice by registered mail which requires the old lessee to file its acceptance and pay the balance of the rental due for the first year would not be properly given while an appeal is pending or until the award to the old lessee has become final. Curtis v. Center Realty Co., 502 P.2d 365,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1972).

Appeal by old lessee

of school land, taken within 30 days after commissioners affirmed prior order granting another's application for lease, was timely where prior order had been made without notice to old lessee. Mercer v. Thorley, 48 Wyo. 141, 43 P.2d 692,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1935).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-109.
When rental due; procedure upon failure to pay.

Upon notice provided not less than thirty (30) days prior to the anniversary date of a lease, all rentals accruing to the state by virtue of this act, except those for the first year, shall become due and payable at the office of the director on the anniversary date of the lease. If the rent is not paid on the anniversary date, the director shall notify the lessee or his authorized agent by certified mail that the lease will be cancelled if the rent and a late fee equal to ten percent (10%) of the annual rental is not received within thirty (30) days following the date of the notice. If the lease is cancelled, the director shall as soon as possible thereafter, advertise the lands in the county where located, as vacant and subject to lease.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 91-115; C.S. 1945, § 24-116; W.S. 1957, § 36-69; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-110.
Right to make and remove improvements.

A lessee of state lands shall have the right to construct or make improvements upon state lands in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per section for each separate improvement, without first obtaining permission. If the lessee or any other person desires to construct or make improvements upon state lands in excess of the value of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per section for each separate improvement, he shall file an application for permission to construct or make the improvements with the director, which shall be subject to allowance or rejection as the best interests of the state require. The director shall have authority to grant permission to construct improvements in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per section for each separate improvement for fencing, water development, livestock handling facilities and range enhancements. Any other improvement in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per section for each separate improvement shall be applied for under a special use permit. Unless permission has been obtained in the manner provided by this section or the improvement has been registered as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the owner of any improvement in excess of the value of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per section at the time of construction of the improvement shall not be entitled to compensation therefor as provided by W.S.

36-5-111

and

36-9-105

, and upon the expiration of the lease the improvements shall forfeit to and become the property of the state; except, that within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of the expiration of the lease, the owner may remove such improvements in a manner which minimizes injury to the land.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a lessee of state lands may register all improvements made upon state lands which were made prior to June 30, 2010, with or without prior approval by the director. Improvements registered under this subsection may include improvements for which approval was not applied for pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Improvements for which permission was denied under subsection (a) of this section shall not be eligible for registration under this subsection. Registrations under the provisions of this subsection shall be made not later than June 30, 2014. Improvements registered under this subsection shall be entitled to compensation therefor as provided by W.S.

36-5-111

and

36-9-105

.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 16; R.S. 1931, § 91-116; C.S. 1945, § 24-117; W.S. 1957, § 36-70; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 2011, ch. 18, § 1; ch. 118, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to sale of land on which lessee constructed improvements, see §

36-9-105

.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 18, § 1, substituted “an amount not to exceed” for “the amount of,” inserted “for each separate improvement” in the first and second sentences, inserted “per section for each separate improvement” in the third and fourth sentences, and in the last sentence, substituted “any improvement” for “the improvements,” and inserted “at the time of construction of the improvement.”

Laws 2011, ch. 18 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2011.

The second amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (a), inserted “or the improvement has been registered as provided in subsection (b) of this section”; and added (b).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

This section cannot be given retroactive application

to facts which occurred prior to its enactment. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-111.
Payment for or removal of existing improvements.

Any applicant applying to lease state lands upon which there are fences, buildings, reservoirs, ditches, dams, wells, or other improvements of any kind, belonging to or made by another, or for which water rights or proportionate interests in irrigation reservoirs, canals, or systems, have been acquired, shall before receiving the lease, pay to the director for the use and benefit of the owner or maker of any improvements at the time of the execution of the lease, the contributory value thereof as finally determined by the board in accordance with its rules and regulations; or the owner of the improvements shall, upon giving notice to the director in writing within the time fixed by board rule and regulation, have the right to remove those improvements in a manner which minimizes injury to the land; provided, that the improvements be removed within a period of one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of the expiration of the lease. For purposes of this section, “contributory value” means the increased value of the property after the lessee’s improvements are considered.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 91-117; C.S. 1945, § 24-118; W.S. 1957, § 36-71; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Cited

in

White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-112.
Form and execution of lease; bond.

The general form of grazing and agricultural lease upon state lands shall be prescribed by the board and shall be signed by the director on behalf of the state. Except in cases where the board deems necessary, leases shall be issued without bond.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 91-118; C.S. 1945, § 24-119; W.S. 1957, § 36-72; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-113.
Cancellation of leases.

The board shall have the power and authority to cancel leases procured by fraud, deceit or misrepresentation, or for use of the lands for unlawful or illegal purposes, or for the violation of the covenants of the lease, upon proper proof thereof.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 91-121; C.S. 1945, § 24-122; W.S. 1957, § 36-73.

Court without jurisdiction to order cancellation. —

Where board had executed lease for state lands to a person and relator contended that lands were wrongfully leased, lessee not being party to proceeding, court was without jurisdiction to order cancellation of lease, and board should not be required to execute another lease for same land. State ex rel. Marsh v. State Land Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 478, 53 P. 292,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1898).

Board not required to cancel. —

Although information furnished board in application for lease by other parties within one mile of tract applied for was untrue, board was not required to cancel lease in contest proceeding, in absence of showing state had been damaged thereby or that contestant's interest had been injuriously affected. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-114.
Leasing for industrial, commercial and recreational purposes; authority; rental fees; rules and regulations.

The board of land commissioners may lease for a term of not more than seventy-five (75) years state lands for industrial, commercial and recreational purposes.

The board may lease state lands for purposes which shall bring about the compatible use of the surface area and shall inure to the greatest long term benefit of the state land trust. Provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall result in the substantive impairment of existing leases or the preferential right to the renewal thereof.

The board shall fix a rental value based upon not less than the fair market value of each use of the land. If the land to be leased under this subsection was originally acquired by the state for the benefit of the common school permanent land fund, and is to be used by a Wyoming school district for the construction and maintenance of school buildings and facilities, the board may assess an annual rental fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per acre or not less than fair market value, whichever is less.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations implementing policies, procedures and standards for the long-term leasing of state lands for industrial, commercial and recreational purposes under the provisions of W.S.

36-5-114

through

36-5-117

, including provisions requiring compliance with all applicable land use planning and zoning laws and permitting the board to terminate a lease for good cause shown.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 187, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-73.1; Laws 1971, ch. 179, § 1; 1979, ch. 60, § 1; 1985, ch. 118, § 1; 1996, ch. 39, § 1; 1997, ch. 145, § 1; ch. 200, § 1; 2004, ch. 56, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “seventy-five (75) years” for “twenty-five (25) years,” and deleted “with a preferential right to renew for successive like periods” following “years”; in (b), substituted “compatible use” for “multiple use”; in (c), deleted “on the basis of a definite amount per acre” following “shall fix a rental value”; added (d); and made a stylistic change.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-115.
Leasing for industrial, commercial and recreational purposes; “recreational purposes” defined.

As used in W.S.

36-5-114

through

36-5-117

the term “recreational purposes” means land used for cabin sites, public camp sites, public parks and recreation areas, golf courses and any associated residential development, youth groups and ski or winter sports areas.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 187, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-73.2; Laws 1971, ch. 179, § 2; 2004, ch. 56, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “W.S.

36-5-114

through

36-5-117

” for “this act,” and inserted “and any associated residential development.”

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-116.
Leasing for industrial, commercial and recreational purposes; assignment or transfer.

Leases issued under the provisions of W.S.

36-5-114

through

36-5-117

shall not be assignable or transferable except with written consent of the board of land commissioners.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 187, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 36-73.3; Laws 2004, ch. 56, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “W.S.

36-5-114

through

36-5-117

” for “this act.”

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-5-117.
Lessee’s liability.

A state lands lessee’s liability to users of those lands is limited as specified in W.S.

34-19-101

through

34-19-107

. A state lands lessee’s liability to users of improvements upon those lands is limited to the same extent, provided that:

The improvement is properly authorized under W.S.

36-5-110

or has otherwise been authorized by the board of land commissioners; and

The lessee did not charge the user to use the improvement.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 27, § 1; 2019 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated the existing paragraph as (a), substituted “W.S.

34-19-101

through

34-19-107

” for “W.S.

34-19-101

through

34-19-106

,” and added the second sentence, (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 63.01 (Matthew Bender).